Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 1. System of Public Schools; General Provisions.
§ 22.1-4.1.
Street addresses required in certain school admission documents.

Documents submitted for admission of any child to public schools in the Commonwealth, except such documents required in accordance with §§ 22.1-3.1 and 22.1-270, shall include the street address or route number of each pupil’s residence. If no street address or route number exists for such residence, a post office box number shall be required.

If the pupil is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3, and for that reason the school division determines, on the basis of the affidavit of the person seeking to enroll the pupil, that a street address, route number, or post office box number cannot be provided, it may accept an address in an alternate form it deems appropriate.

Address information provided under this section shall not be released to any person unless otherwise authorized by law.

History.

1997, c. 900; 2000, c. 209; 2004, c. 500; 2019, c. 586.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 209 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 500 substituted “is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision 6 of” for “has no fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, and has a primary nighttime residence as described in subsection 6 of” in the second paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 586 substituted “subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3” for “subdivision A 6 of § 22.1-3” in the second paragraph.

§ 22.1-4.2.
Designation of race or ethnicity.

School board employees administering tests or other assessment instruments shall not require any public school students being tested to disclose their race or ethnicity on such tests.Nothing in this subsection shall, however, prevent relevant school division personnel from obtaining such information from the students’ permanent record and placing such information on such test or assessment instrument.

No student or his parent shall be required to disclose information related to the student’s race or ethnicity unless (i) the student or his parent is given an option to designate “other” for the student’s race or ethnicity or (ii) such disclosure is required by federal law.

History.

2000, c. 273; 2018, c. 587.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 587 designated the existing provisions as subsection A; in subsection A, deleted “elementary” preceding “school students” in the first paragraph and substituted “subsection” for “section” in the second paragraph; and added subsection B.

§ 22.1-4.3.
Participation by and notification of noncustodial parent.

Unless a court order has been issued to the contrary, the noncustodial parent of a student enrolled in a public school or day care center (i) shall not be denied the opportunity to participate in any of the student’s school or day care activities in which such participation is supported or encouraged by the policies of the school or day care center solely on the basis of such noncustodial status and (ii) shall be included, upon the request of such noncustodial parent, as an emergency contact for the student’s school or day care activities.

For the purposes of this section, “school or day care activities” shall include, but shall not be limited to, lunch breaks, special in-school programs, parent-teacher conferences and meetings, and extracurricular activities. It is the responsibility of the custodial parent to provide the court order to the school or day care center.

History.

1997, c. 762, § 22.1-279.5; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2005, c. 34.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 34, in the first paragraph, inserted the clause (i) designator and added “and (ii) shall be included, upon the request of such noncustodial parent, as an emergency contact for the student’s school or day care activities” at the end.

§ 22.1-5.
Regulations concerning admission of certain persons to schools; tuition charges.

Consistent with Article VIII, Section 1 of the Constitution of Virginia, no person may be charged tuition for admission or enrollment in the public schools of the Commonwealth, whether on a full-time or part-time basis, who meets the residency criteria set forth in § 22.1-3. No person of school age shall be charged tuition for enrollment in a program preparing students to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education or alternative program offered as a regional or divisionwide initiative by the local school division in which such person is deemed to reside pursuant to § 22.1-3. Further, no person of school age shall be denied admission or charged tuition when (i) such person’s custodial parent has been deployed outside the United States as a member of the Virginia National Guard or as a member of the United States armed forces; and (ii) such person’s custodial parent has executed a Special Power of Attorney under Title 10, United States Code, § 1044b providing for the care of the person of school age by an individual who is defined as a parent in § 22.1-1 during the time of his deployment outside the United States. The person of school age shall be allowed to attend a school in the school division in which the individual providing for his care, pursuant to the Special Power of Attorney under Title 10, United States Code, § 1044b, resides. Furthermore, when practicable, such persons of school age may continue to attend school in the Virginia school division they attended immediately prior to the deployment and shall not be charged tuition for attending such division.The following persons may, however, in the discretion of the school board of a school division and pursuant to regulations adopted by the school board, be admitted into the public schools of the division and may, in the discretion of the school board, be charged tuition:

Persons who reside within the school division but who are not of school age.

Persons of school age who are residents of the Commonwealth but who do not reside within the school division, except as provided in this section.

Persons of school age who are attending school in the school division pursuant to a foreign student exchange program approved by the school board.

Persons of school age who reside beyond the boundaries of the Commonwealth but near thereto in a state or the District of Columbia which grants the same privileges to residents of the Commonwealth.

Persons of school age who reside on a military or naval reservation located wholly or partly within the geographical boundaries of the school division and who are not domiciled residents of the Commonwealth of Virginia; however, no person of school age residing on a military or naval reservation located wholly or partly within the geographical boundaries of the school division may be charged tuition if federal funds provided under P.L. 874 of 1950, commonly known as Impact Aid, shall fund such students at not less than 50 percent of the total per capita cost of education, exclusive of capital outlay and debt service, for elementary or secondary pupils, as the case may be, of such school division. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, such persons of school age who reside on a military or naval reservation with military-owned housing located wholly or partly within the geographical boundaries of multiple school divisions shall be deemed eligible for interscholastic programs immediately upon enrollment in a public elementary or secondary school in any of the aforementioned school divisions, provided that such persons (i) satisfy all other requirements for eligibility and (ii) are dependents of a military service member required by the military to live on the military installation as evidenced by a statement on command letterhead signed by, or by direction of, the service member’s commanding officer.

Persons of school age who, as domiciled residents of the Commonwealth who were enrolled in a public school within the school division, are required as a result of military or federal orders issued to their parents to relocate and reside on federal property in another state or the District of Columbia, if the school division subsequently enrolling such persons is contiguous to such state or District of Columbia.

Persons of school age who reside in the school division and who are enrolled in summer programs, exclusive of required remediation as provided in § 22.1-253.13:1, or in local initiatives or programs not required by the Standards of Quality or the Standards of Accreditation.For the purposes of determining the residency of persons described in subdivisions 1 and 2, local school boards shall adopt regulations consistent with the residency requirements regarding persons residing in housing or temporary shelter, or on property located in multiple jurisdictions, as articulated in § 22.1-3.

Persons of school age who are not residents of the Commonwealth but are living temporarily with persons residing within a school division may, in the discretion of the school board and pursuant to regulations adopted by it, be admitted to the public schools of the school division. Tuition shall be charged such persons.

No tuition charge authorized or required in this section shall exceed the total per capita cost of education, exclusive of capital outlay and debt service, for elementary or secondary pupils, as the case may be, of such school division and the actual, additional costs of any special education or gifted and talented program provided the pupil, except that if the tuition charge is payable by the school board of the school division of the pupil’s residence pursuant to a contract entered into between the two school boards, the tuition charge shall be that fixed by such contract.

School boards may accept and provide programs for students for whom English is a second language who entered school in Virginia for the first time after reaching their twelfth birthday, and who have not reached 22 years of age on or before August 1 of the school year. No tuition shall be charged such students, if state funding is provided for such programs.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-218.3, 22-219, 22-220; 1958, c. 628; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 81, § 1; 1964, c. 192; 1968, c. 178; 1976, cc. 681, 713; 1978, c. 140; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 342; 1993, c. 293; 1994, c. 887; 1999, cc. 394, 443, 465, 988; 2000, c. 253; 2004, c. 967; 2007, c. 42; 2013, cc. 641, 669; 2014, c. 84.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 394 added subdivision A 6.

The 1999 amendment by c. 443, in subsection A, added sentences one and two, inserted “however” preceding “in the discretion” in the third sentence, and added subdivision 7.

The 1999 amendment by c. 465 substituted “however” for “provided, however, that” in subdivision A 5; deleted “provided however, that no state funds may be used to provide programs under this subsection for any individual who has reached his 18th birthday and who does not provide documentation of United States citizenship or legal presence in the United States” from the end of subsection D; and deleted the former subsection E, which read: “Any local school board accepting students pursuant to this section shall establish acceptance criteria consistent with relevant federal and state law and regulation.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 988 added the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 253 deleted “if the school division admitting such persons borders such state or District of Columbia” at the end of subdivision A 4.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 967 added the third and fourth sentences of subsection A, inserted “except as provided in this section” to the end of subdivision A 2, substituted “50 percent” for “fifty percent” in subdivision A 5 and “22 years” for “twenty two years” in subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 42, in subsection A, deleted former clause (iii), which read: “(iii) such person has been attending a public school in this Commonwealth while residing with his custodial parent” in the third sentence, deleted “or, when practicable, to continue to attend the school in which he was enrolled while residing with his custodial parent” from the end of the fourth sentence, added the last sentence, and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 641 and 669 are identical, and added the last sentence of subdivision A 5 and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection A, second sentence, substituted “program preparing students to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “general education development.”

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

For 2003/2004 survey of education law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2004).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

False information relating to residency. —

A locality does not have the authority to enact an ordinance imposing a civil or criminal penalty against a parent enrolling a child based on false information that indicates the parent and child are residents of the local government, or to enact an ordinance holding a parent liable for the tuition or educational costs in such a situation. See opinion of Attorney General to Delegate M. Kirkland Cox, 04-094, 2005 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (4/7/05).

Capital renovation costs for school property that is neither leased nor owned. —

A school board does not currently have the legal authority to fund capital renovation costs for school property that it does not lease and which is fully owned and operated by a different county school board. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Joe T. May, Member, House of Delegates, 13-028, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 44 (6/28/13).

§ 22.1-5.1.
Organizations governing public school interscholastic programs; participation by students in military families.

No public elementary or secondary school shall become a member of any organization or entity whose purpose is to regulate or govern interscholastic programs that does not deem eligible for participation a student who:

Previously attended the school and (i) moved with a parent, as defined in § 22.1-1, out of the school’s attendance area because that parent is a full-time active duty member of the uniformed services of the United States, including service in the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. §§ 1209 and 1211, and received orders to relocate and (ii) moved back to and currently lives in the school’s attendance area; or

Continues to live in the school’s attendance area, but whose parent, as defined in § 22.1-1, moved out of the school’s attendance area because that parent is a full-time active duty member of the uniformed services of the United States, including service in the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. §§ 1209 and 1211, and received orders to relocate.

Nothing in this section shall affect the school board’s discretion to admit a student to a public school in the local school division and charge tuition for his attendance if the student is not deemed to reside in the local school division pursuant to §§ 22.1-3 and 22.1-5.

History.

2013, c. 553.

§ 22.1-6.
Permitted fees and charges.

Except as provided in this title or as permitted by regulation of the Board of Education, no fees or charges may be levied on any pupil by any school board. No pupil’s scholastic report card or diploma shall be withheld because of nonpayment of any such fee or charge.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-197, 22-198, 22-199; 1977, c. 204; 1980, c. 559.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

School board cannot require parents to pay for substance abuse testing and treatment program. —

A county school board does not have authority to require parents to pay for testing and treatment program as condition to granting excused absences to students suspended for substance abuse. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph V. Gartlan Jr., Member, Senate of Virginia, 99-101, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 5 (1/11/00).

Transportation to special program. —

A local school board may not charge a fee for the transportation of a student enrolled in a specialty program located outside the boundaries of the student’s base school. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jackson H. Miller, Member, House of Delegates, 10-016, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (3/18/10).

County school board is solely responsibility for school consolidation. —

Local school board cannot impose a mandatory fee on students taking advanced placement courses for the required taking of the Advanced Placement Examination. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David W. Marsden, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-121, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (01/28/11).

§ 22.1-6.1.
Menstrual supplies; availability; public elementary, middle, and high schools.

As used in this section, “menstrual supplies” means tampons or pads for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.

Each school board shall make menstrual supplies available, at all times and at no cost to students, in such accessible locations as it deems appropriate in each elementary school in the local school division.

Each school board shall make menstrual supplies available, at all times and at no cost to students, in the bathrooms of each middle school and high school in the local school division.

History.

2020, cc. 675, 676.

§ 22.1-7.
Responsibility of each state board, agency, and institution having children in residence or in custody.

Each state board, state agency, and state institution having children in residence or in custody shall have responsibility for providing for the education and training to such children which is at least comparable to that which would be provided to such children in the public school system. Such board, agency, or institution may provide such education and training either directly with its own facilities and personnel in cooperation with the Board of Education or under contract with a school division or any other public or private nonreligious school, agency, or institution.

The Board of Education shall supervise the education and training provided to school-age individuals in state training centers, and shall provide for and direct the education for school-age individuals in state hospitals operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

The Board shall prescribe standards and regulations for all such education and training provided directly by a state board, state agency, or state institution.

Each state board, state agency, or state institution providing such education and training shall submit annually its program therefor to the Board of Education for approval in accordance with regulations of the Board.

If any child in the custody of any state board, state agency, or state institution is a child with disabilities as defined in § 22.1-213 and such board, agency, or institution must contract with a private nonreligious school to provide special education as defined in § 22.1-213 for such child, the state board, state agency, or state institution may proceed as a guardian pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of § 22.1-218.

Any person of school age who is admitted pursuant to § 16.1-338, 16.1-339, or 16.1-340.1 or in accordance with an order of involuntary commitment entered pursuant to §§ 16.1-341 through 16.1-345 to a state facility for children and adolescents operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall, upon admission, be permitted to participate in any education program offered in the facility that is administered by the Department of Education, regardless of his enrollment status. Information required to enroll such person in any such education program may be disclosed in accordance with state and federal law. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require enrollment in an education program if such person has been excused from attendance at school pursuant to subdivision B 1 of § 22.1-254.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-9.1:04; 1972, c. 603; 1974, c. 480; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 207; 1994, c. 854; 2005, c. 928; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2019, cc. 173, 281.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928 substituted “nonreligious school” for “nonsectarian school” in the second and last sentences and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” at the end of the third sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals in state training centers, and shall provide for and direct the education for school-age individuals in state hospitals operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “residents in state mental retardation facilities, and provide for and direct the education for school-age residents in state mental health facilities” in the third sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 173 and 281 are identical, and designated the existing provisions as subsections A through E and added subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-7.1.
Open school enrollment policy.

Any local school board may establish and implement policies to provide for the open enrollment to any school of any student residing within the school division upon the request of a parent or guardian. In developing such policies, a local school board may include the following conditions and limitations:

An application process whereby a parent or guardian indicates a school preference for purposes of his child attending a school in the child’s school division but outside of the attendance area in which the child resides;

A requirement that the parent or guardian provide transportation for the student attending a school other than his assigned school;

A requirement that a student may be disqualified from attending a school other than his assigned school if he has been subject to a specified disciplinary action;

A prohibition on the recruitment of a student from one school to another by a school division employee;

A limitation on participation in certain athletic activities for a student who chooses to attend a school other than his assigned school;

A random, unbiased selection process in the event open enrollment requests exceed the capacity of a school;

A provision that a student shall be permitted to remain at the receiving school until the student has completed the highest grade level in the school; and

A preference to a student (i) who resides in a location that has been subject to a change in school attendance area during the previous two years, (ii) who has a sibling attending the receiving school, or (iii) whose parent or guardian is an employee of the receiving school.

A copy of the school division’s policies for open enrollment, if any, shall be posted on the division’s website and shall be available to the public upon request.

Nothing in this section shall interfere with a local school board’s authority to adopt a pupil assignment plan pursuant to § 22.1-79.

For the purposes of this section, “open enrollment” means a policy adopted and implemented by a local school board to allow any student to enroll in any school within the school division of attendance regardless of the location of the student’s residence.

History.

2012, c. 510; 2013, c. 805; 2015, c. 369; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 805, cl. 3 provides: “That the initial transfer of supervision of schools to the Institution shall occur after the 2013-2014 school year.”

Acts 2013, c. 805, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 805 inserted “not including a school previously in the school division that is currently under the supervision of the Opportunity Educational Institution” in subsection A, in the first sentence. For applicability provision, see Editor’s note.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 369 deleted “not including a school previously in the school division that is currently under the supervision of the Opportunity Educational Institution” following “open enrollment to any school” in subsection A.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 substituted “assignment” for “placement” in subsection C.

§ 22.1-7.2.
Enrollment for students residing on a military installation or in military housing.

As used in this section, “military installation” means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, fort, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the Department of Defense, including any leased facility, that is located in whole or in part within the Commonwealth. “Military installation” does not include any facility used primarily for civil works, rivers and harbors projects, or flood control projects.

Any local school board of a school division in which a military installation or other military housing is located shall establish and implement policies to provide for the enrollment to any school of any student residing on a military installation or in military housing within the school division upon the request of his parent if space in the school is available. In developing such policies, a local school board may include any of conditions listed in subsection A of § 22.1-7.1 or any other condition deemed appropriate by the local school board.

A copy of the school division’s policies for enrollment for students residing on a military installation or in military housing within the school division shall be posted on the division’s website and shall be available to the public upon request.

History.

2018, c. 390.